Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6785YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2382 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 School resource officer 1 grant program ââ appropriation. 2 1. The department shall develop and administer a school 3 resource officer grant program to provide grants to school 4 districts to offset the costs associated with employing, or 5 retaining the services of, one school resource officer, as 6 defined in 34 U.S.C. Â§10389. 7 2. The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 8 17A to administer this section, including rules relating to 9 grant application materials, eligibility requirements, and 10 award criteria. The rules must require the department to award 11 grants on a first-come, first-served basis. The state board is 12 responsible for approving or rejecting applications submitted 13 by school districts pursuant to this section. 14 3. A school district must provide matching moneys, on a 15 one-to-one basis, to receive a grant from the department under 16 this section. The municipality in which the school district is 17 located may assist the school district in providing matching 18 moneys under this subsection. The amount of a grant awarded 19 by the department under this section shall not exceed twelve 20 thousand dollars. 21 4. Moneys awarded under this section shall be used to 22 supplement, not supplant, existing public funding used by a 23 school district for similar purposes. 24 5. A school resource officer grant program fund is 25 established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 26 administered by the department and shall consist of moneys 27 appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received 28 by the department for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the 29 fund are appropriated to the department for the school resource 30 officer grant program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys 31 in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 32 to the general fund of the state but shall remain available 33 for expenditure for the school resource officer grant program 34 for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 35 -1- LSB 6785YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2382 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 1 be credited to the fund. 2 Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION ââ SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER GRANT 3 PROGRAM FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of 4 the state to the department of education for the fiscal year 5 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 6 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 7 purposes designated: 8 For deposit in the school resource officer grant program 9 fund created in section 256.20, as enacted in this Act: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 480,000 11